Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB128.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 344.030 TO 344.110 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds and declares that it is imperative to remove obstacles
and barriers to employment for persons with past criminal records. Persons with
past criminal records should not be discriminated against and prevented from
engaging in meaningful and profitable employment opportunities that will assist
them in resuming the responsibilities of citizenship.
(2) It is an unlawful practice for an employer to consider or require disclosure of the
criminal record or criminal history, including past felony or misdemeanor
convictions and pending felony and misdemeanor charges, of an applicant for
employment:
(a) Until the applicant has been selected for an interview by the employer; or
(b) If there is not an interview, before a conditional offer of employment is
made to the applicant.
(3) An employer may ask an applicant for information about criminal history at the
first interview or thereafter, in accordance with all applicable state and federal
laws.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any law enforcement agency position;
(b) Any position requiring a criminal background check pursuant to federal or
state law, rules, regulations, or case law, or a self-regulatory organization
as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. sec.
78c(a)(26);
(c) Any position in which an applicant with a criminal background is
disqualified from employment pursuant to federal or state law; or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/16/2024 2:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 458
(d) Any position in which the applicant would be required to obtain a standard
fidelity bond or an equivalent bond, but would be disqualified from
obtaining such a bond due to a criminal conviction.
(5) This section does not prohibit an employer from notifying applicants that current
law or the employer's policy will disqualify an individual with a particular
criminal history background from employment in particular positions.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Ban the Box - The Criminal Record
Employment Discrimination Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/16/2024 2:58 PM Jacketed